Maine, session 132, LD1240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3146, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 702, §7, is amended to read:
§3146. Climate change protection plan
No later than December 31, 2023 May 1, 2027, and every 3 5 years thereafter, a
transmission and distribution utility shall submit to the commission a 10-year plan that
includes specific actions for addressing the expected effects of climate change on the
utility's assets needed to transmit and distribute electricity to its customers. The commission
shall provide a process to allow for the input from interested parties on the transmission
and distribution utility's plan. The commission may use the plan and the input received
from interested parties in rate cases or other proceedings involving the transmission and
distribution utility.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3148, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 553, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Periodic review. Beginning January 15, 2025 2027, and every 5 years thereafter,
the commission shall conduct a review or update a previous review or contract with a
consultant to conduct a review or update a previous review of available grid-enhancing
technology that could be implemented by a large investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility to reduce or defer the need for investment in grid infrastructure in the
State. The commission may produce a report or contract with a consultant to produce a
report describing the grid-enhancing technology identified in the review. The commission
may file information or the report for use in rate cases or other proceedings involving a
large investor-owned transmission and distribution utility, including the integrated grid
planning proceeding required pursuant to section 3147, subsection 2.
Sec. 3. 2027 review of available grid-enhancing technology. The review
conducted in 2027 pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3148,
subsection 2 must update the review conducted in 2025 by the Public Utilities Commission
Page 1 - 132LR0549(03)

or a consultant of the commission of available grid-enhancing technology that could be
implemented by a large investor-owned transmission and distribution utility to reduce or
defer the need for investment in grid infrastructure in the State.
Page 2 - 132LR0549(03)